Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 2

Conservatorship [Repealed]

34-4-201 — 34-4-213.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§34-4-201 —34-4-213 (Acts 1955, ch. 280, §§ 8-10; 1978, ch. 598, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 499, §§ 1, 4; T.C.A. §§ 34-1015 — 34-1017,34-12-201 —34-12-213), concerning conservatorship, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 50, effective January 1, 1993. For new law concerning guardianship and conservatorship, see chs. 1-3 of this title.